Arkansas, session 2025, HB1307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 28-69-802 is amended to read as follows:
28-69-802. Definitions.
In this subchapter:
(1) “Charitable purpose” means the relief of poverty, the
advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, the promotion
of a governmental purpose, or any other purpose the achievement of which is
beneficial to the community.
(2) “Endowment fund” means an institutional fund or part thereof
that, under the terms of a gift instrument, is not wholly expendable by the
institution on a current basis. The term does not include assets that an
institution designates as an endowment fund for its own use.
(3) “Gift instrument” means a record or records, including an
institutional solicitation, under which property is granted to, transferred
to, or held by an institution as an institutional fund.
(4) “Institution” means:
*LJH020*
02-26-2025 10:36:53 LJH020

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H2/17/25 S2/26/25 HB1307
(A) a person, other than an individual, organized and
operated exclusively for charitable purposes;
(B) a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, to the extent that it holds funds exclusively for a
charitable purpose; or
(C) a trust that had both charitable and noncharitable
interests, after all noncharitable interests have terminated.
(5) “Institutional fund” means a fund held by an institution
exclusively for charitable purposes. The term does not include:
(A) program-related assets;
(B) a fund held for an institution by a trustee that is
not an institution; or
(C) a fund in which a beneficiary that is not an
institution has an interest, other than an interest that could arise upon
violation or failure of the purposes of the fund.
(6)(A) "Materially negative financial impact" means a materially
negative financial impact on the institutional fund's total net investment
performance, considering all financial returns received by the fund and all
costs paid by the fund.
(B) "Materially negative financial impact" does not
include the government institution's administrative costs that are not paid
by the fund.
(6)(7) “Person” means an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision,
agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(7)(8) “Program-related asset” means an asset held by an
institution primarily to accomplish a charitable purpose of the institution
and not primarily for investment.
(8)(9) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a
tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form.
(10) "Service provider" means a person, including without
limitation an affiliate, offering or providing financial services to the
institutional fund, including without limitation:
(A) an investment manager, investment company, securities
02-26-2025 10:36:53 LJH020

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H2/17/25 S2/26/25 HB1307
broker or dealer, investment advisor, or subadvisor; or
(B) a proxy advisor, including any person who provides
corporate governance ratings, proxy research and analyses, proxy voting
advice, or other similar services, for compensation and for the purpose of
advising a shareholder on how to vote on measures under consideration by
shareholders or proxy voting on behalf of a shareholder.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 28-69-803, concerning the standard of
conduct in managing and investing in an institutional fund, is amended to add
additional subsections to read as follows:
(f) Except as provided under subsection (h) of this section, in
managing and investing an institutional fund, an institution under § 28-69-
802(4)(B), including without limitation a two-year or four-year state
supported institution of higher education, shall not:
(1) Consider any of the goals under subdivisions (f)(2)(A)
through (f)(2)(F) of this section, except as required to comply with
subdivision (f)(2) of this section, regarding:
(A) A possible investment by the institutional fund;
(B) The selection of a service provider; or
(C) The voting of shares by the institutional fund; or
(2) Direct or allow any service provider, in connection with its
duties to the institutional fund, to act in a way that is aligned with any of
the following goals beyond what is required by controlling law:
(A) Directly or indirectly eliminating, reducing,
offsetting, or disclosing a reduction target for greenhouse gas emissions,
including without limitation by restricting the exploration, production,
utilization, transportation, sale, or manufacturing of timber, mining,
agriculture, or fossil-fuel-based energy;
(B) Instituting a corporate board or employment
composition target or criterion that incorporate a characteristic protected
in this state under the Arkansas Civil Rights Act of 1993, § 16-123-101 et
seq.;
(C) Providing access to or facilitating an abortion,
gender-reassignment, or sex-reassignment medication or procedure;
(D) Restricting public access to a firearm, ammunition, or
a component part or accessory of a firearm, including without limitation by
02-26-2025 10:36:53 LJH020

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H2/17/25 S2/26/25 HB1307
restricting the distribution, sale, manufacturing, importing, marketing, or
advertising of a firearm, ammunition, or a component part or accessory of a
firearm;
(E) Reducing the amount of business conducted with any
entity for the purpose of advancing any of the goals under this subdivision
(f)(2); or
(F) Advancing the purposes of any international agreement
related to any of the goals under this subdivision (f)(2).
(g) Subdivision (f)(2) of this section shall not apply if the
institution under § 28-69-802(4)(B) determines that subdivision (f)(2) of
this section would require the selection of a service provider that would
have a materially negative financial impact on the institutional fund,
provided that the institution under § 28-69-802(4)(B):
(1) Contracts with a service provider that most closely meets
the requirements of subdivision (f)(2) of this section and would not have a
materially negative financial impact on the institutional fund;
(2) Documents the determination of the institution under § 28-
69-802(4)(B), along with documenting evidence supporting its determination
through a description of the services of at least three (3) alternative
service providers that were consulted and including without limitation a
description of:
(A) Fees;
(B) Historical investment performance; and
(C) Evidence of compliance with subdivision (f)(2) of this
section; and
(3) Publicly posts notice seeking a service provider that would
comply with subdivision (f)(2) of this section at the following times:
(A) No later than sixty (60) days after the selection of a
service provider that does not meet the requirements of subdivision (f)(2) of
this section;
(B) No later than sixty (60) days before the beginning of
any following procurement period under which that service provider could be
replaced; and
(C) As part of any following procurement announcement
under which that service provider could be replaced; and
(4) Reevaluates its determination at least annually under
02-26-2025 10:36:53 LJH020

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 H2/17/25 S2/26/25 HB1307
subdivisions (g)(1) — (3) of this section.
(h) The requirements under subsection (f) of this section shall not
apply to the investment and management of special gifts for which the intent
of a donor was:
(1) Contrary to subsection (f) of this section; and
(2) Expressed in the gift instruction before January 1, 2024.

/s/McAlindon




























02-26-2025 10:36:53 LJH020